Illinois, session 104th, SB3669.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 527-1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 27-1)7    Sec. 27-1. Areas of education taught; multi-tiered system 8of support; discrimination Areas of education taught - 9discrimination on account of sex.10    (a) The State of Illinois, having the responsibility of 11defining requirements for elementary and secondary education, 12establishes that the primary purpose of schooling is the 13transmission of knowledge and culture through which children 14learn in areas necessary to their continuing development and 15entry into the world of work. Such areas include the language 16arts, mathematics, the biological, physical and social 17sciences, the fine arts and physical development and health.18    Each school district shall give priority in the allocation 19of resources, including funds, time allocation, personnel, and 20facilities, to fulfilling the primary purpose of schooling.21    The State Board of Education shall establish goals and 22learning standards consistent with the above purposes and 23define the knowledge and skills which the State expects   SB3669- 2 -LRB104 17126 LNS 30545 b1students to master and apply as a consequence of their 2education.3    Each school district shall establish learning objectives 4consistent with the State Board of Education's goals and 5learning standards for the areas referred to in this Section, 6shall develop appropriate testing and assessment systems for 7determining the degree to which students are achieving the 8objectives, and shall develop reporting systems to apprise the 9community and State of the assessment results.10    Each school district shall make available to all students 11academic and vocational courses for the attainment of learning 12objectives.13    (b) In this subsection (b), "multi-tiered system of 14support" means a tiered process of appropriate instruction and 15support that uses differentiated instructional strategies for 16students, provides students with an evidence-based curriculum 17and interventions aligned with State standards, continuously 18monitors student performance using scientific, research-based 19progress monitoring instruments, and makes data-driven 20educational decisions based on a student's response to the 21interventions. A multi-tiered system of support uses a 22problem-solving method to define the problem, determines which 23students require additional support, analyzes the problem 24using data to determine why there is a discrepancy between 25what is expected and what is occurring, establishes one or 26more student performance goals, develops an intervention plan   SB3669- 3 -LRB104 17126 LNS 30545 b1to address the performance goals, and delineates how student 2progress will be monitored and how implementation integrity 3will be ensured.4    Each school district and its schools shall create, 5maintain, and implement a policy for providing academic, 6social-emotional, and behavioral intervention within a 7framework of a multi-tiered system of support.8    The multi-tiered system of support process should use a 9collaborative team approach and include the engagement of and 10regular communication with the child's parent or guardian. The 11parent or guardian of a child identified for additional 12support shall be provided with written notice of the school 13district's use of scientific, research-based intervention 14within a multi-tiered system of support and the purpose of the 15intervention. The parent or guardian may be part of the 16collaborative team approach at the discretion of the school 17district. The parent or guardian shall be provided all data 18collected and reviewed by the school district with regard to 19the child in the scientific, research-based intervention or 20multi-tiered system of support process. The State Board of 21Education may provide guidance to school districts and 22identify available resources related to facilitating parent or 23guardian engagement in a multi-tiered system of support 24process.25    Nothing in this Section affects the responsibility of a 26school district to identify, locate, and evaluate children   SB3669- 4 -LRB104 17126 LNS 30545 b1with disabilities who are in need of special education 2services in accordance with the federal Individuals with 3Disabilities Education Act, this Code, or any applicable 4federal or State rules. 5    (c) No student shall be refused admission into or be 6excluded from any course of instruction offered in the common 7schools by reason of that person's sex. No student shall, 8solely by reason of that person's sex, be denied equal access 9to physical education and interscholastic athletic programs or 10comparable programs supported from school district funds. This 11Section is violated when a high school subject to this Act 12participates in the post-season basketball tournament of any 13organization or association that does not conduct post-season 14high school basketball tournaments for both boys and girls, 15which tournaments are identically structured. Conducting 16identically structured tournaments includes having the same 17number of girls' teams as boys' teams playing, in their 18respective tournaments, at any common location chosen for the 19final series of games in a tournament; provided, that nothing 20in this paragraph shall be deemed to prohibit the selection 21for the final series of games in the girls' tournaments of a 22common location that is different than the common location 23selected for the final series of games in the boys' 24tournaments. Except as specifically stated in this Section, 25equal access to programs supported by school district funds 26and comparable programs will be defined in rules promulgated   SB3669- 5 -LRB104 17126 LNS 30545 b1by the State Board of Education in consultation with the 2Illinois High School Association.3(Source: P.A. 94-875, eff. 7-1-06.) 4    (105 ILCS 5/14-8.02h rep.)5    Section 10. The School Code is amended by repealing 6Section 14-8.02h.